Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3208] Obligations under compact not
impaired. Nothing contained in sections [304A-3206] and [304A-3207] shall
be construed to alter any of the obligations or restrict or impair any of the
rights that the State may have under the compact establishing the commission.
[L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next